Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-732
Action plan; controls; duration; amendment of plan.

The controls in the action plan approved by the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment pursuant to section 46-728 shall be exercised by the district for the period of time necessary to stabilize or reduce the level of contamination and prevent the increase or spread of ground water contamination. An action plan may be amended by the same method utilized in the adoption of the action plan.

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-674.13;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 52;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.46;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 73;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 40;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 230.